Tennessee, session 114, HB0491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-13-203, is amended by deleting
the language "and The Kroger Co." wherever it appears and substituting instead the language
"The Kroger Co., Amneal Pharmaceuticals LLC, Hikma Pharmaceuticals USA Inc., and Sun
Pharmaceutical Industries, Inc.".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-11-103(p), is amended by
deleting the language "or The Kroger Co." and substituting instead the language "The Kroger
Co., Amneal Pharmaceuticals LLC, Hikma Pharmaceuticals USA Inc., or Sun Pharmaceutical
Industries, Inc.".
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0491
001063
- 1 -